Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1704.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "material defect" in section 7102 of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 7102 OF TITLE 68 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING DEFINITIONS TO READ:§ 7102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when <--<--12345678910111213141516171819 used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Flood damage." Damage to the subject property, including damage to personal property located on the subject property, caused by a natural flood event."Flood-related risk factor "FLOOD RISK INDICATOR ." Any of the following that indicate a potential risk of flood damage to the subject property:(1) Whether the subject property has previously experienced flood damage . , AND IF SO, THE NUMBER OF TIMES AND ESTIMATED DATES OF THE FLOOD DAMAGE.(2) Whether the subject property is in a special flood hazard area or moderate risk flood hazard area, as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.(3) Whether the owner of the subject property is required to obtain and maintain flood insurance.(4) Whether the current owner or any previous owner of the subject property SELLER received any form of governmental assistance for flood damage to the subject property.(5) Whether the current owner of the subject property maintains flood insurance on the subject property.(6) current owner of the subject property (5) WHETHER THE SELLER has ever filed an insurance claim for flood damage to the subject property, either through a private insurance company or through the National Flood Insurance Program.(7) Whether there is an elevation certificate on the subject property from the Federal Emergency Management Agency."Material defect." As follows:20250HB1704PN2385 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A problem with a residential real property or any portion of it that would have a significant adverse impact on the value of the property or that involves an unreasonable risk to people on the property.(2) The fact that a structural element, system or subsystem is near, at or beyond the end of the normal useful life of such a structural element, system or subsystem is not by itself a material defect.(3) The term includes a flood-related risk factor.* * *"Natural flood event." A general and temporary condition of partial or complete inundation of two or more acres of normally dry land area or of two or more parcels of real property, at least one of which is the subject property, from any of the following:(1) Overflow of inland or tidal waters.(2) Unusual and rapid accumulation or runoff of surface waters from any source.(3) Mudflow.(4) Collapse or subsidence of land along the shore of a lake or similar body of water as a result of erosion or undermining caused by waves or currents of water exceeding anticipated cyclical levels.* * *Section 2. Section 7304(b) of Title 68 is amended by adding a paragraph to read: 7304(B)(13) OF TITLE 68 IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 7304. Disclosure form.* * *(b) Contents of property disclosure statement.--The form of property disclosure statement promulgated by the State Real 20250HB1704PN2385 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Estate Commission shall call for disclosures with respect to all of the following subjects:* * *(18) Any flood-related risk factor, to the best of the seller's knowledge. If known and applicable, the seller shall disclose the number of times and the estimated dates that the subject property experienced flood damage.* * *(13) [SOILS, DRAINAGE, BOUNDARIES AND SINKHOLES.] LAND, INCLUDING SOILS, DRAINAGE, BOUNDARIES, SINKHOLES AND FLOOD RISK INDICATORS.* * *Section 3. Title 68 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 7305.1. Website information.The Insurance Department shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website information about flood-related risk factors, flood mitigation and flood insurance and links to available information that identifies properties in a flood hazard area.§ 7305.2. Flood disclosure.Once the information is posted in accordance with section 7305.1 (relating to website information), the seller of a property shall provide to the buyer of the property, as part of the seller's disclosure form or in addition to the seller's disclosure form, the following written disclosure:PLEASE READ: IMPORTANT INFORMATION ON FLOOD INSURANCEMany properties in Pennsylvania are experiencing increased risks regarding flooding. You are encouraged to visit the Insurance Department's website to review flood-related risk factors. A standard homeowner's insurance 20250HB1704PN2385 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 policy typically does not cover damage caused by flooding. You are encouraged to speak with an insurance professional about your homeowner's insurance policy to determine whether you are covered for damage caused by flooding. If you are not already covered for damage caused by flooding, coverage may be available from an insurance company or through the National Flood Insurance Program.SECTION 4. FOR THE PURPOSE OF IMPLEMENTING THE AMENDMENT OF 68 PA.C.S. § 7304(B)(13), REVISIONS TO THE PROPERTY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT SHALL BE PROMULGATED BY THE STATE REAL ESTATE COMMISSION WITHIN 18 MONTHS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION AS A FINAL-OMITTED REGULATION UNDER THE ACT OF JUNE 25, 1982 (P.L.633, NO.181), KNOWN AS THE REGULATORY REVIEW ACT, WITH NOTICE OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING OMITTED UNDER SECTION 204 OF THE ACT OF JULY 31, 1968 (P.L.769, NO.240), REFERRED TO AS THE COMMONWEALTH DOCUMENTS LAW.Section 4 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1704PN2385 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718